Maryland, session 2026, HB0305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
14–125.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0305*

HOUSE BILL 305
(2) (I) “Community association” means a Maryland nonprofit
ASSOCIATION, corporation, OR OTHER ORGANIZATION that IS:
[(i) Is comprised of at least 20% of the total number of households as
members, with a minimum membership of 25 households, of a local community that
consists of 40 or more individual households as defined by specific geographic boundaries
in the bylaws or charter of the community association;
(ii) Requires, as a condition of membership, the payment of
monetary dues at least annually;]
1. COMPOSED OF RESIDENTS OF A COMMUNITY THAT IS
DEFINED BY SPECIFIC GEOGRAPHIC BOUNDARIES IN THE BYLAWS OR CHARTER OF
THE COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION;
[(iii)] 2. [Is operated] OPERATED primarily for the promotion of
social welfare and general neighborhood improvement and enhancement;
[(iv) Has been in existence for at least 1 year when it files suit under
this section;]
[(v) 1.] 3. [Is exempt] EXEMPT from taxation under § 501(c)(3) or
(4) OR § 528 of the Internal Revenue Code; [or
2. Has been included for a period of at least 1 year prior to
bringing an action under this section in the “Directory of Organizations in Baltimore
County” that is published by the Baltimore County Public Library;] and
[(vi)] 4. [Is] INCORPORATED AND in good standing WITH THE
STATE DEPARTMENT OF ASSESSMENTS AND TAXATION.
(II) “COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION” INCLUDES A MARYLAND
NONPROFIT ASSOCIATION, CORPORATION, OR OTHER ORGANIZATION THAT:
1. MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF AN INDIVIDUAL
COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
2. REPRESENTS TWO OR MORE INDIVIDUAL COMMUNITY
ASSOCIATIONS.
(3) (I) “Local code violation” means a violation under ARTICLE 13,
Title [22.] 7. “Nuisances” OR, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, ARTICLE 35, “BUILDINGS AND HOUSING” of the Baltimore County Code
[1988] 2015, AS AMENDED.

HOUSE BILL 305 3
(II) “LOCAL CODE VIOLATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE A
VIOLATION UNDER:
1. ARTICLE 35, TITLE 4. “RENT ESCROW LAW” OF THE
BALTIMORE COUNTY CODE 2015, AS AMENDED; OR
2. ANY STORMWATER MANAGEMENT PROVISION OF THE
BALTIMORE COUNTY CODE.
(4) “Nuisance” means, within the boundaries of the community
represented by the community association, an act or condition created, performed, or
maintained on private property that constitutes a local code violation and that:
(i) Negatively impacts the well–being of other residents of the
neighborhood; and
(ii) 1. Is injurious to public health, safety, or welfare of
neighboring residents; or
2. Obstructs the reasonable use of other property in the
neighborhood.
(b) This section only applies to a nuisance located within the boundaries of
Baltimore County.
(c) (1) A community association may seek injunctive and other equitable relief
in the Circuit Court for Baltimore County for abatement of a nuisance upon showing that:
(i) The notice requirements under paragraphs (2) and (3) of this
subsection have been satisfied; and
(ii) The nuisance has not been abated.
(2) (i) 1. An action may not be brought under this section based on
a nuisance until 60 days after the community association gives notice of the violation and
of the community association’s intent to bring an action under this section by certified mail,
return receipt requested, to the County Code enforcement agency.
2. IF THE APPROPRIATE COUNTY CODE ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY IS THE BALTIMORE COUNTY DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT, AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE BROUGHT IF THE
BALTIMORE COUNTY DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
PROVIDES A WRITTEN RESPONSE TO THE COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION WITHIN 60 DAYS
AFTER RECEIVING THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBPARAGRAPH THAT THE

HOUSE BILL 305
PROPERTY THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF THE VIOLATION IS PART OF AN ACTIVE CODE
ENFORCEMENT PLAN.
(ii) An action under this section may not be brought if the County
Code enforcement agency has filed an action for equitable relief from the nuisance.
(3) (i) An action may not be brought under this section until 60 days
after the tenant, if any, and owner of record receive notice by certified mail, return receipt
requested, from the community association that a nuisance exists and that legal action may
be taken if the nuisance is not abated.
(ii) The notice shall specify:
1. The nature of the alleged nuisance;
2. The date and time of day the nuisance was first
documented;
3. The location on the property where the nuisance is
allegedly occurring; and
4. The relief sought.
(iii) 1. THE NOTICE SHALL BE PROVIDED TO THE TENANT, IF
ANY, AND THE OWNER OF RECORD IN THE SAME MANNER AS SERVICE OF PROCESS
IN A CIVIL IN PERSONAM ACTION UNDER THE MARYLAND RULES.
2. ADEQUATE AND SUFFICIENT NOTICE MAY BE GIVEN
TO THE TENANT, IF ANY, AND THE OWNER OF RECORD BY SENDING A COPY OF THE
NOTICE BY REGULAR MAIL AND POSTING A COPY OF THE NOTICE ON THE PROPERTY
WHERE THE NUISANCE IS ALLEGEDLY OCCURRING, IF NOTICE SENT BY CERTIFIED
MAIL IS:
A. RETURNED UNCLAIMED OR REFUSED;
B. DESIGNATED BY THE POST OFFICE TO BE
UNDELIVERABLE FOR ANY OTHER REASON; OR
C. SIGNED FOR BY A PERSON OTHER THAN THE
ADDRESSEE.
(IV) In filing a suit under this section, an officer of the community
association shall certify to the court:
1. What steps the community association has taken to satisfy
the notice requirements under this subsection; and

HOUSE BILL 305 5
2. That each condition precedent to the filing of an action
under this section has been met.
[(4) The court shall determine in what amount and under what conditions,
if any, a bond shall be filed by a community association in an action for relief under this
section.]
(4) (I) AN ACTION MAY NOT BE BROUGHT AGAINST AN OWNER OF
RESIDENTIAL RENTAL PROPERTY UNLESS, PRIOR TO THE PROVISION OF NOTICE
UNDER PARAGRAPH (3)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A NOTICE OF VIOLATION RELATING
TO THE NUISANCE HAS FIRST BEEN ISSUED BY AN APPROPRIATE CODE
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY.
(II) IN THE CASE OF A NUISANCE BASED ON A HOUSING OR
BUILDING CODE VIOLATION, OTHER THAN A RECURRENT SANITATION VIOLATION,
RELIEF MAY NOT BE GRANTED UNDER THIS SECTION UNLESS A VIOLATION NOTICE
RELATING TO THE NUISANCE HAS BEEN ISSUED BY AN OFFICIAL OF THE STATE OR
BALTIMORE COUNTY AND REMAINS OUTSTANDING AFTER A PERIOD OF 75 DAYS.
(d) A political subdivision of the State or any agency of a political subdivision is
not subject to any action brought under this section or an action resulting from an action
brought under this section against a private property owner.
(e) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, this section may not be
construed to abrogate any equitable or legal right or remedy otherwise available under the
law to abate a nuisance.
(2) This section may not be construed as granting standing for an action:
(i) Challenging any zoning, development, special exception, or
variance application or approval;
(ii) In which the alleged nuisance consists of:
1. A condition relating to lead paint;
2. An interior physical defect of a property, except in
situations that present a threat to neighboring properties; or
3. A vacant dwelling that is maintained in a boarded
condition, free from trash and debris, and secure against trespassers and weather entry;
(iii) Involving any violation of alcoholic beverages laws under the
Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article; or

HOUSE BILL 305
(iv) Involving any matter in which a certificate, license, permit, or
registration is required or allowed under the Environment Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.